Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 25.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201671-1796
Act, how cited.

Sections 71-1796 to 71-1799 shall be known and
may be cited as the Nebraska Center for Nursing Act.

Laws 2000, LB 1025, § 1;

Laws 2005, LB 243, § 2;

Laws 2010, LB849, § 25.